Utah statutes.
59-25-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Construction waste or demolition waste" is as defined in Section 19-6-102.

(2)  "Disposal" is as defined in Section 19-6-102.

(3)  "Hazardous waste" is as defined in Section 19-6-102.

(4)  "Hazardous waste facility" means a hazardous waste treatment and disposal facility, as defined in Section 19-6-202, that receives, for profit, hazardous waste for treatment or disposal.

(5)  "Household waste" is as defined in Section 19-6-102.

(6)  "Municipal solid waste" means household waste, nonhazardous commercial solid waste, and nonhazardous sludge.

(7)  "Nonhazardous solid waste" is solid waste, as defined in Section 19-6-102, except that it does not include:

(a)  hazardous waste;

(b)  municipal solid waste; or

(c)  construction waste or demolition waste.

(8)  "Nonhazardous solid waste facility" means a commercial nonhazardous solid waste treatment or disposal facility as defined in Section 19-6-102.

(9)  "Solid waste" is as defined in Section 19-6-102.

(10)  "Treatment" is as defined in Section 19-6-102.

